Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1261YC (5) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 15F.201, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. âSmall businessâ means any enterprise 3 which is located in this state, which is operated for profit 4 and under a single management, and which has either fewer than 5 twenty employees or an annual gross income of less than four 6 million dollars computed as the average of the enterpriseâs 7 immediately preceding three consecutive fiscal years. 8 Sec. 2. Section 15F.202, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 9 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 10 A city or county in the state or , a public organization , or 11 a small business may submit an application to the board for 12 financial assistance for a project under the program. The 13 assistance shall be provided only from funds, rights, and 14 assets legally available to the board and shall be in the form 15 of grants, loans, forgivable loans, and credit enhancement and 16 financing instruments. The application shall include, but not 17 be limited to, the following information: 18 Sec. 3. Section 15F.204, subsections 5, 6, and 7, Code 2025, 19 are amended to read as follows: 20 5. The board shall allocate all moneys in the fund in the 21 following manner: 22 a. One-third of the moneys shall be allocated to provide 23 assistance to cities and counties , or to small businesses 24 located wholly within the city or county, which meet the 25 following criteria: 26 (1) A city which has a population of ten thousand or less 27 according to the most recently published census. 28 (2) A county which has a population that ranks in the bottom 29 thirty-three counties according to the most recently published 30 census. 31 b. Two-thirds of the moneys shall be allocated to provide 32 assistance to any small business, city , and county in the 33 state, which may include a small business, city , or county 34 included under paragraph âaâ . 35 -1- LSB 1261YC (5) 91 nls/ko 1/ 2 H.F. _____ 6. If two or more cities , or counties , or small businesses 1 submit a joint project application for financial assistance 2 under the program, all joint applicants must meet the criteria 3 of subsection 5 , paragraph âaâ , in order to receive any moneys 4 allocated under that paragraph. 5 7. If any portion of the allocated moneys under subsection 6 5 , paragraph âaâ , has not been awarded by April 1 of the fiscal 7 year for which the allocation is made, the portion which has 8 not been awarded may be utilized by the board to provide 9 financial assistance under the program to any small business, 10 city , or county in the state. 11